Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 11 IDAHO CODE OF MILITARY JUSTICE
No person is eligible to act as military judge in a case if that person is the accuser or a witness, or has acted as preliminary hearing officer or a counsel in the same case.

The military judge of a court-martial may not consult with the members of the court except in the presence of the accused, trial counsel, and defense counsel, nor vote with the members of the court.

A military judge may be detailed under subsection (a) of this article to a court-martial or a proceeding under article 30 that is convened in a different armed force, when so permitted by the senior force judge advocate of the armed force of which the military judge is a member.

ARTICLE 26A. MILITARY MAGISTRATES

A military magistrate will be a commissioned officer of the state military forces who:

Is a member of the bar of a federal court or a member of the bar of the highest court of a state; and

Is certified to be qualified, by reason of education, training, experience, and judicial temperament, for duty as a military magistrate by the state judge advocate.

In accordance with regulations promulgated by the governor or his designee, in addition to duties when designated under this code, a military magistrate may be assigned to perform other duties of a nonjudicial nature.

ARTICLE 27. DETAIL OF TRIAL COUNSEL AND DEFENSE COUNSEL

General provision:

For each general and special court-martial, the authority convening the court shall detail trial counsel, defense counsel, and such assistants as are appropriate.

No person who, with respect to a case, has served as a preliminary hearing officer, court member, military judge, military magistrate, or appellate judge may later serve as trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, or, unless expressly requested by the accused, as defense counsel or assistant or associate defense counsel in the same case. No person who has acted for the prosecution may act later in the same case for the defense nor may any person who has acted for the defense act later in the same case for the prosecution.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this article, trial counsel, defense counsel, or assistant defense counsel detailed for a general or special court-martial must be:

A judge advocate as defined in article 1(a)(3) of this code; and

A member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of the state where the court-martial is held.

Defense counsel and assistant defense counsel detailed for a special or general court-martial shall have the qualifications set forth in subsection (b) of this article.

Trial counsel, assistant trial counsel, defense counsel, and assistant defense counsel detailed for a special court-martial must be determined to be competent to perform such duties by the senior force judge advocate, under such rules as the governor or his designee may prescribe.

ARTICLE 28. DETAIL OR EMPLOYMENT OF REPORTERS AND INTERPRETERS

Under such regulations as may be prescribed, the convening authority of a general or special court-martial or court of inquiry shall detail or employ qualified court reporters, who shall record the proceedings of and testimony taken before that court and may detail or employ interpreters who shall interpret for the court.

ARTICLE 29. ASSEMBLY AND IMPANELING OF MEMBERS — DETAIL OF NEW MEMBERS AND MILITARY JUDGES

The military judge shall announce the assembly of a general or special court-martial with members. After such a court-martial is assembled, no member may be absent, unless the member is excused:

As a result of a challenge;

Under subsection (b)(1)(B) of this article; or

By order of the military judge or the convening authority for disability or other good cause.

Impaneling.

Under rules prescribed by the governor or his designated representative, the military judge of a general or special court-martial with members shall:

After determination of challenges, impanel the court-martial; and

Excuse the members who, having been assembled, are not impaneled.

In a general court-martial, the military judge shall impanel eight (8) members.

In a special court-martial, the military judge shall impanel four (4) members.

In addition to members under subsection (b) of this article, the military judge shall impanel alternate members, if the convening authority authorizes alternate members.

Detail of new members.

If, after members are impaneled, the membership of the court-martial is reduced to fewer than twelve (12) members with respect to a general court-martial in a capital case, fewer than six (6) members with respect to a general court-martial in a noncapital case, or fewer than four (4) members with respect to a special court-martial, the trial may not proceed unless the convening authority details new members and, from among the members so detailed, the military judge impanels new members sufficient in number to provide the membership specified in paragraph (2) of this subsection.

Membership shall be as follows:

At least six (6) but not more than eight (8) members with respect to a general court-martial; and
(B) Four (4) members with respect to a special court-martial.

If the military judge is unable to proceed with the trial because of disability or otherwise, a new military judge shall be detailed to the court-martial.

Evidence.

In the case of new members under subsection (d) of this article, the trial may proceed with the new members present after the evidence previously introduced is read or, in the case of audiotape, videotape, or similar recording, is played, in the presence of the new members, the military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

In the case of a new military judge under subsection (e) of this article, the trial shall proceed as if no evidence had been introduced, unless the evidence previously introduced is read or, in the case of audiotape, videotape, or similar recording, is played, in the presence of the new military judge, the accused, and counsel for both sides.

PART VI. PRE-TRIAL PROCEDURE

ARTICLE 30. CHARGES AND SPECIFICATIONS

In general. Charges and specifications:

May be preferred only by a person subject to this chapter; and

Shall be preferred by presentment in writing, signed under oath before a commissioned officer of the state military forces who is authorized to administer oaths.

The writing under subsection (a) of this article shall state that:

The signer has personal knowledge of, or has investigated, the matters set forth in the charges and specifications; and

The matters set forth in the charges and specifications are true, to the best of the knowledge and belief of the signer.

When charges and specifications are preferred under subsection (a) of this article, the proper authority shall, as soon as practicable:

Inform the person accused of the charges and specifications; and

Determine what disposition should be made of the charges and specifications in the interest of justice and discipline.

ARTICLE 31. COMPULSORY SELF-INCRIMINATION PROHIBITED

No person subject to this code may compel any person to incriminate himself or to answer any question, the answer to which may tend to incriminate him.

No person subject to this code may interrogate or request any statement from an accused or a person suspected of an offense without first informing that person of the nature of the accusation and advising that person that the person does not have to make any statement regarding the offense of which the person is accused or suspected and that any statement made by the person may be used as evidence against the person in a trial by court-martial.

No person subject to this code may compel any person to make a statement or produce evidence before any military court if the statement or evidence is not material to the issue and may tend to degrade the person.

No statement obtained from any person in violation of this article or through the use of coercion, unlawful influence, or unlawful inducement may be received in evidence against the person in a trial by court-martial.

ARTICLE 32. INVESTIGATION

In general.

Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a preliminary hearing shall be held before referral of charges and specifications for trial by general court-martial. The preliminary hearing shall be conducted by an impartial hearing officer, detailed by the convening authority in accordance with subsection (b) of this article.
(1)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a preliminary hearing shall be held before referral of charges and specifications for trial by general court-martial. The preliminary hearing shall be conducted by an impartial hearing officer, detailed by the convening authority in accordance with subsection (b) of this article.

Under regulations prescribed by the governor or his designated representative, a preliminary hearing need not be held if the accused submits a written waiver to the convening authority and the convening authority determines that a hearing is not required.

The purpose of the preliminary hearing shall be limited to determining the following:

Whether or not the specification alleges an offense under this chapter;

Whether or not there is probable cause to believe that the accused committed the offense charged;

Whether or not the convening authority has court-martial jurisdiction over the accused and over the offense; and

A recommendation as to the disposition that should be made of the case.

Hearing officer.

A preliminary hearing under this article shall be conducted by an impartial hearing officer who:

Whenever practicable, shall be a judge advocate who is certified under article 27(b); or

When it is not practicable to appoint a judge advocate because of exceptional circumstances, is not a judge advocate so certified.

In the case of a hearing officer under paragraph (1)(B) of this subsection, a judge advocate who is certified under article 27(b) shall be available to provide legal advice to the hearing officer.

Whenever practicable, the hearing officer shall be equal in grade or senior in grade to military counsel who are detailed to represent the accused or the government at the preliminary hearing.

Report to convening authority. After a preliminary hearing under this article, the hearing officer shall submit to the convening authority a written report, accompanied by a recording of the preliminary hearing, that includes the following:

For each specification, a statement of the reasoning and conclusions of the hearing officer with respect to determinations under subsection (a)(2) of this article, including a summary of relevant witness testimony and documentary evidence presented at the hearing and any observations of the hearing officer concerning the testimony of witnesses and the availability and admissibility of evidence at trial;

Recommendations for any necessary modifications to the form of the charges or specifications;

An analysis of any additional information submitted after the hearing by the parties or by a victim of an offense, that under such rules as the governor or his designated representative may prescribe, is relevant to disposition under articles 30 and 34; and

A statement of action taken on evidence adduced with respect to uncharged offenses, as described in subsection (d) of this article.

If evidence adduced in an investigation under this article indicates that the accused committed an uncharged offense, the investigating officer may investigate the subject matter of that offense without the accused having first been charged with the offense if the accused:

Is present at the investigation;

Is informed of the nature of each uncharged offense investigated; and

Is afforded the opportunities for representation, cross-examination, and presentation prescribed in subsection (b) of this article. A declination under this paragraph shall not serve as the sole basis for ordering a deposition under article 49.

The requirements of this article are binding on all persons administering this code, but failure to follow them does not constitute jurisdictional error under such rules as the governor or his designated representative may prescribe.

A defect in a report under subsection (c) of this article is not a basis for relief if the report is in substantial compliance with subsection (c).

ARTICLE 33. DISPOSITION GUIDANCE

The governor or his designated representative shall issue nonbinding guidance regarding factors that commanders, convening authorities, staff judge advocates, and judge advocates should take into account when exercising their duties with respect to disposition of charges and specifications in the interest of justice and discipline under articles 30 and 34. Such guidance shall take into account, with appropriate consideration of military requirements, the principles of fair and evenhanded administration of Idaho and federal criminal law.

ARTICLE 34. ADVICE TO CONVENING AUTHORITY BEFORE REFERRAL FOR TRIAL

Staff judge advocate advice required before referral. Before referral of charges and specifications to a general court-martial for trial, the convening authority shall submit the matter to the staff judge advocate for advice, which the staff judge advocate shall provide to the convening authority in writing. The convening authority may not refer a specification under a charge to a general court-martial unless the staff judge advocate advises the convening authority in writing that:

The specification alleges an offense under this chapter;

There is probable cause to believe that the accused committed the offense charged; and

A court-martial would have jurisdiction over the accused and the offense.

Staff judge advocate recommendation as to disposition. Together with the written advice provided under subsection (a) of this article, the staff judge advocate shall provide a written recommendation to the convening authority as to the disposition that should be made of the specification in the interest of justice and discipline.

Staff judge advocate advice and recommendation to accompany referral. When a convening authority makes a referral for trial by general court-martial, the written advice of the staff judge advocate under subsection (a) of this article and the written recommendation of the staff judge advocate under subsection (b) of this article with respect to each specification shall accompany the referral.

Special court-martial; convening authority consultation with judge advocate. Before referral of charges and specifications to a special court-martial for trial, the convening authority shall consult a judge advocate on relevant legal issues.

General and special courts-martial; correction of charges and specifications before referral. Before referral for trial by general court-martial or special court-martial, changes may be made to charges and specifications:

To correct errors in form; and

When applicable, to conform to the substance of the evidence contained in a report under article 32(c).

Referral defined. In this article, the term “referral” means the order of a convening authority that charges and specifications against an accused be tried by a specified court-martial.

ARTICLE 35. SERVICE OF CHARGES — COMMENCEMENT OF TRIAL

In general. Trial counsel detailed for a court-martial under article 27 shall cause to be served upon the accused a copy of the charges and specifications referred for trial.

Commencement of trial.

Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, no trial or other proceeding of a general court-martial or a special court-martial, including any session under article 39(a), may be held over the objection of the accused:

With respect to a general court-martial, from the time of service through the fifth day after the date of service; or

With respect to a special court-martial, from the time of service through the third day after the date of service.

An objection under paragraph (1) of this subsection may be raised only at the first session of the trial or other proceeding and only if the first session occurs before the end of the applicable period under paragraph (1)(A) or (1)(B) of this subsection. If the first session occurs before the end of the applicable period, the military judge shall, at that session, inquire as to whether the defense objects under this subsection.

This subsection shall not apply in time of war.

PART VII. TRIAL PROCEDURE

ARTICLE 36. GOVERNOR OR THE ADJUTANT GENERAL MAY PRESCRIBE RULES

Pretrial, trial, and posttrial procedures, including modes of proof, for courts-martial cases arising under this code, and for courts of inquiry, may be prescribed by the governor or the adjutant general by regulations, or as otherwise provided by law, which shall apply the principles of law and the rules of evidence generally recognized in military criminal cases in the courts of the armed forces but which may not be contrary to or inconsistent with this code.

ARTICLE 37. UNLAWFULLY INFLUENCING ACTION OF COURT

No authority convening a general, special, or summary court-martial, nor any other commanding officer, or officer serving on the staff thereof, may censure, reprimand, or admonish the court or any member, the military judge, or counsel thereof, with respect to the findings or sentence adjudged by the court or with respect to any other exercise of its or their functions in the conduct of the proceedings. No person subject to this code may attempt to coerce or, by any unauthorized means, influence the action of a court-martial or court of inquiry or any member thereof, in reaching the findings or sentence in any case, or the action of any convening, approving, or reviewing authority with respect to their judicial acts. The foregoing provisions of this subsection shall not apply with respect to: (1) general instructional or informational courses in military justice if such courses are designed solely for the purpose of instructing members of a command in the substantive and procedural aspects of courts-martial; or (2) to statements and instructions given in open court by the military judge, summary court-martial officer, or counsel.
(b) In the preparation of an effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency report, or any other report or document used in whole or in part for the purpose of determining whether a member of the state military forces is qualified to be advanced in grade, or in determining the assignment or transfer of a member of the state military forces, or in determining whether a member of the state military forces should be retained on active status, no person subject to this code may, in preparing any such report: (1) consider or evaluate the performance of duty of any such member as a member of a court-martial or witness therein; or (2) give a less favorable rating or evaluation of any counsel of the accused because of zealous representation before a court-martial.

ARTICLE 38. DUTIES OF TRIAL COUNSEL AND DEFENSE COUNSEL

The trial counsel of a general or special court-martial shall be a member in good standing of the state bar and shall prosecute in the name of the state and shall, under the direction of the court, prepare the record of the proceedings.

Defense counsel:

The accused has the right to be represented in defense before a general or special court-martial or at an investigation under article 32 of this code as provided in this subsection.

The accused may be represented by civilian counsel at the provision and expense of the accused.

The accused may be represented:

By military counsel detailed under article 27 of this code; or

By military counsel of the accused’s own selection if that counsel is reasonably available as determined under paragraph (7) of this subsection.

If the accused is represented by civilian counsel, military counsel detailed or selected under paragraph (3) of this subsection shall act as associate counsel unless excused at the request of the accused.

Except as provided under paragraph (6) of this subsection, if the accused is represented by military counsel of his own selection under paragraph (3)(B) of this subsection, any military counsel detailed under paragraph (3)(A) of this subsection shall be excused.

The accused is not entitled to be represented by more than one military counsel. However, the person authorized under regulations prescribed under article 27 of this code to detail counsel, in that person’s sole discretion:

May detail additional military counsel as assistant defense counsel; and

If the accused is represented by military counsel of the accused’s own selection under paragraph (3)(B) of this subsection, may approve a request from the accused that military counsel detailed under paragraph (3)(A) of this subsection act as associate defense counsel.

The senior force judge advocate of the same force of which the accused is a member shall determine whether the military counsel selected by an accused is reasonably available.

In any court-martial proceeding resulting in a conviction, the defense counsel:

May forward for attachment to the record of proceedings a brief of such matters as counsel determines should be considered in behalf of the accused on review, including any objection to the contents of the record which counsel considers appropriate; and

May take other action authorized by this code.

ARTICLE 39. SESSIONS

At any time after the service of charges which have been referred for trial to a court-martial composed of a military judge and members, the military judge may, subject to article 35 of this code, call the court into session without the presence of the members for the purpose of:

Hearing and determining motions raising defenses or objections which are capable of determination without trial of the issues raised by a plea of not guilty;

Hearing and ruling upon any matter which may be ruled upon by the military judge under this code, whether or not the matter is appropriate for later consideration or decision by the members of the court;

Holding the arraignment and receiving the pleas of the accused;

Conducting a sentencing proceeding and sentencing the accused in noncapital cases unless the accused requests sentencing by members under article 25; and

Performing any other procedural function which does not require the presence of the members of the court under this code. These proceedings shall be conducted in the presence of the accused, the defense counsel, and the trial counsel and shall be made a part of the record. These proceedings may be conducted notwithstanding the number of court members and without regard to article 29.

When the members of a court-martial deliberate or vote, only the members may be present. All other proceedings, including any other consultation of the members of the court with counsel or the military judge, shall be made a part of the record and shall be in the presence of the accused, the defense counsel, the trial counsel, and the military judge.

ARTICLE 40. CONTINUANCES

The military judge of a court-martial or a summary court-martial may, for reasonable cause grant a continuance to any party for such time and as often as may appear to be just.

ARTICLE 41. CHALLENGES

Challenges generally.

The military judge and members of a general or special court-martial may be challenged by the accused or the trial counsel for cause stated to the court. The military judge or the court shall determine the relevancy and validity of challenges for cause and may not receive a challenge to more than one (1) person at a time. Challenges by the trial counsel shall ordinarily be presented and decided before those by the accused are offered.

If exercise of a challenge for cause reduces the court below the number of members required by article 16 of this code, all parties shall, notwithstanding article 29 of this code, either exercise or waive any challenge for cause then apparent against the remaining members of the court before additional members are detailed to the court. However, peremptory challenges shall not be exercised at that time.

Preemptory challenges.

Each accused and the trial counsel are entitled initially to one (1) peremptory challenge of members of the court. The military judge may not be challenged except for cause.

If exercise of a peremptory challenge reduces the court below the minimum number of members required by article 16 of this code, the parties shall, notwithstanding article 29 of this code, either exercise or waive any remaining peremptory challenge, not previously waived, against the remaining members of the court before additional members are detailed to the court.

Whenever additional members are detailed to the court, and after any challenges for cause against such additional members are presented and decided, each accused and the trial counsel are entitled to one (1) peremptory challenge against members not previously subject to peremptory challenge.

ARTICLE 42. OATHS OR AFFIRMATIONS

Before performing their respective duties, military judges, general and special courts-martial members, trial counsel, defense counsel, reporters, and interpreters shall take an oath or affirmation in the presence of the accused to perform their duties faithfully. The form of the oath or affirmation, the time and place of the taking thereof, the manner of recording the same, and whether the oath or affirmation shall be taken for all cases in which these duties are to be performed or for a particular case, shall be as prescribed in regulation or as provided by law. These regulations may provide that an oath or affirmation to perform faithfully the duties as a military judge, trial counsel, or defense counsel may be taken at any time by any judge advocate or other person certified or designated to be qualified or competent for the duty, and if such an oath or affirmation is taken, it need not again be taken at the time the judge advocate or other person is detailed to that duty.

Each witness before a court-martial shall be examined under oath or affirmation.

ARTICLE 43. STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a person charged with any offense is not liable to be tried by court-martial or punished under article 15 of this code if the offense was committed more than three (3) years before the receipt of sworn charges and specifications by an officer exercising court-martial jurisdiction over the command or before the imposition of punishment under article 15 of this code.

Periods in which the accused is absent without authority or fleeing from justice shall be excluded in computing the period of limitation prescribed in this article.

Periods in which the accused was absent from territory in which the state has the authority to apprehend him, or in the custody of civil authorities, or in the hands of the enemy, shall be excluded in computing the period of limitation prescribed in this article.

When the United States is at war, the running of any statute of limitations applicable to any offense under this code:

Involving fraud or attempted fraud against the United States, any state, or any agency of either in any manner, whether by conspiracy or not;

Committed in connection with the acquisition, care, handling, custody, control, or disposition of any real or personal property of the United States or any state; or

Committed in connection with the negotiation, procurement, award, performance, payment, interim financing, cancellation, or other termination or settlement, of any contract, subcontract, or purchase order which is connected with or related to the prosecution of the war, or with any disposition of termination inventory by any war contractor or government agency;

Exception.

If charges or specifications are dismissed as defective or insufficient for any cause and the period prescribed by the applicable statute of limitations:

Has expired; or will be met.

Will expire within one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of dismissal of the charges and specifications, trial and punishment under new charges and specifications are not barred by the statute of limitations if the conditions specified in paragraph (2) of this subsection are met.

The conditions referred to in paragraph (1) of this subsection are that the new charges and specifications must:

Be received by an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction over the command within one hundred eighty (180) days after the dismissal of the charges or specifications; and

Allege the same acts or omissions that were alleged in the dismissed charges or specifications (or allege acts or omissions that were included in the dismissed charges or specifications).

Fraudulent enlistment or appointment. A person charged with fraudulent enlistment or fraudulent appointment under article 104a(1) may be tried by court-martial if the sworn charges and specifications are received by an officer exercising summary court-martial jurisdiction with respect to that person, as follows:

In the case of an enlisted member, during the period of the enlistment or five (5) years, whichever provides a longer period.

In the case of an officer, during the period of the appointment or five (5) years, whichever provides a longer period.

DNA evidence. If DNA testing implicates an identified person in the commission of an offense punishable by confinement for more than one (1) year, no statute of limitations that would otherwise preclude prosecution of the offense shall preclude such prosecution until a period of time following the implication of the person by DNA testing has elapsed that is equal to the otherwise applicable limitation period.

is suspended until two (2) years after the termination of hostilities as proclaimed by the president or by a joint resolution of congress.

ARTICLE 44. FORMER JEOPARDY

No person may, without his consent, be tried a second time for the same offense.

No proceeding in which an accused has been found guilty by a court-martial upon any charge or specification is a trial in the sense of this article until the finding of guilty has become final after review of the case has been fully completed.

A court-martial with a military judge alone is a trial in the sense of this article if, without fault of the accused after introduction of evidence and before announcement of findings under article 53, the case is dismissed or terminated by the convening authority or on motion of the prosecution for failure of available evidence or witnesses.
(c)(1) A court-martial with a military judge alone is a trial in the sense of this article if, without fault of the accused after introduction of evidence and before announcement of findings under article 53, the case is dismissed or terminated by the convening authority or on motion of the prosecution for failure of available evidence or witnesses.

A court-martial with a military judge and members is a trial in the sense of this article if, without fault of the accused after the members, having taken an oath as members under article 42 and after completion of challenges under article 41, are impaneled, and before announcement of findings under article 53, the case is dismissed or terminated by the convening authority or on motion of the prosecution for failure of available evidence or witnesses.

ARTICLE 45. PLEAS OF THE ACCUSED

Irregular and similar pleas. If an accused after arraignment makes an irregular pleading, or after a plea of guilty sets up matter inconsistent with the plea, or if it appears that the accused has entered the plea of guilty improvidently or through lack of understanding of its meaning and effect, or if the accused fails or refuses to plead, a plea of not guilty shall be entered in the record, and the court shall proceed as though the accused had pleaded not guilty.

Pleas of guilty. With respect to any charge or specification to which a plea of guilty has been made by the accused and accepted by the military judge or by a court-martial without a military judge, a finding of guilty of the charge or specification may be entered immediately without vote. This finding shall constitute the finding of the court unless the plea of guilty is withdrawn prior to announcement of the sentence, in which event the proceedings shall continue as though the accused had pleaded not guilty.

Harmless error. A variance from the requirements of this article is harmless error if the variance does not materially prejudice the substantial rights of the accused.

ARTICLE 46. OPPORTUNITY TO OBTAIN WITNESSES AND OTHER EVIDENCE IN TRIALS BY COURT

In a case referred for trial by court-martial, the trial counsel and the defense counsel shall have equal opportunity to obtain witnesses and other evidence as prescribed by regulations and provided by law. Process issued in court-martial cases to compel witnesses to appear and testify and to compel the production of other evidence shall apply the principles of law and the rules of courts-martial generally recognized in military criminal cases in the courts of the armed forces of the United States, but which may not be contrary to or inconsistent with this code. Process shall run to any part of the United States, or the territories, commonwealths, and possessions, and may be executed by civil officers as prescribed by the laws of the place where the witness or evidence is located or of the United States.

Subpoena and other process generally. Any subpoena or other process issued under this article:

Shall be similar to that which courts of the state of Idaho or courts of the United States having criminal jurisdiction may issue;

Shall be executed in accordance with regulations prescribed by the governor or his designated representative; and

Shall run to any part of the United States and to the commonwealths and possessions of the United States.

Subpoena and other process for witnesses. A subpoena or other process may be issued to compel a witness to appear and testify:

Before a court-martial, military commission, or court of inquiry;

At a deposition under article 49; or

As otherwise authorized under this chapter.

In general. A subpoena or other process may be issued to compel the production of evidence:

For a court-martial, military commission, or court of inquiry;

For a deposition under article 49;

For an investigation of an offense under this chapter; or

As otherwise authorized under this chapter.

Investigative subpoena. An investigative subpoena under subsection (c)(3) of this article may be issued before referral of charges to a court-martial only if a general court-martial convening authority has authorized counsel for the government to issue such a subpoena or a military judge issues such a subpoena pursuant to article 30.

Warrant or order for wire or electronic communications. With respect to an investigation of an offense under this chapter, a military judge detailed in accordance with article 26 or 30 may issue warrants or court orders for the contents of, and records concerning, wire or electronic communications in the same manner as such warrants and orders may be issued by a district court of the state of Idaho under title 19, Idaho Code, subject to such limitations as the governor or his designated representative may prescribe.
(g) Request for relief from subpoena or other process. If a person requests relief from a subpoena or other process under this article on grounds that compliance is unreasonable or oppressive or is prohibited by law, a military judge detailed in accordance with article 26 or 30 shall review the request and shall:

Order that the subpoena or other process be modified or withdrawn, as appropriate; or

Order the person to comply with the subpoena or other process.

ARTICLE 47. REFUSAL OF PERSON NOT SUBJECT TO CHAPTER TO APPEAR, OR TESTIFY, OR PRODUCE EVIDENCE

In general.

Any person described in paragraph (2) of this subsection who does either of the following is guilty of an offense against the United States:

Willfully neglects or refuses to appear; or

Willfully refuses to qualify as a witness or to testify or to produce any evidence which that person is required to produce.

The persons referred to in paragraph (1) of this subsection are the following:

Any person not subject to this chapter who is issued a subpoena or other process described in subsection (c) of article 46 and is provided a means for reimbursement from the government for fees and mileage at the rates allowed to witnesses attending the courts of the United States or, in the case of extraordinary hardship, is advanced such fees and mileage; and

Any person not subject to this chapter who is issued a subpoena or other process described in subsection (d) of article 46.

The fees and mileage of witnesses shall be advanced or paid out of the appropriations for the compensation of witnesses.

ARTICLE 48. CONTEMPT

Authority to punish.

With respect to any proceeding under this chapter, a judicial officer specified in paragraph (2) of this subsection may punish for contempt any person who:

Uses any menacing word, sign, or gesture in the presence of the judicial officer during the proceeding;

Disturbs the proceeding by any riot or disorder; or

Willfully disobeys a lawful writ, process, order, rule, decree, or command issued with respect to the proceeding.

A judicial officer referred to in paragraph (1) of this subsection is any of the following:

Any military judge detailed to a court-martial, a provost court, a military commission, or any other proceeding under this chapter;

Any military magistrate designated to preside under this code; or

The governor or his designated representative of a court of inquiry.

Review. A punishment under this article:

If imposed by a military judge or military magistrate, may be reviewed by the district court of the judicial district where the proceeding was conducted in accordance with the applicable rules of procedure of the Idaho state courts; and
(2) If imposed by a court of inquiry, shall be subject to review by the convening authority in accordance with rules prescribed by the governor or his designated representative.

ARTICLE 49. DEPOSITIONS

In general.

Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a convening authority or a military judge may order depositions at the request of any party.

A deposition may be ordered under paragraph (1) of this subsection only if the requesting party demonstrates that, due to exceptional circumstances, it is in the interest of justice that the testimony of a prospective witness be preserved for use at a court-martial, military commission, court of inquiry, or other military court or board.

A party who requests a deposition under this article shall give to every other party reasonable written notice of the time and place for the deposition.

A deposition under this article shall be taken before, and authenticated by, an impartial officer, as follows:

Whenever practicable, by an impartial judge advocate certified under article 27(b); or

In exceptional circumstances, by an impartial military or civil officer authorized to administer oaths by the laws of the United States or the laws of the place where the deposition is taken.

Representation by counsel. Representation of the parties with respect to a deposition shall be by counsel detailed in the same manner as trial counsel and defense counsel are detailed under article 27. In addition, the accused shall have the right to be represented by civilian or military counsel in the same manner as provided for in article 38(b).

Admissibility and use as evidence. A deposition order under subsection (a) of this article does not control the admissibility of the deposition in a court-martial or other proceeding under this chapter. Except as otherwise provided by this code, a party may use all or part of a deposition as provided by the rules of evidence.

ARTICLE 50. DEFENSE OF LACK OF MENTAL RESPONSIBILITY
